Idaho, session 2026, S1232.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 19-5301, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Title 19, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 63, Title 19, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 63
IDAHO SON OF SAM LAW
19-6301. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Idaho Son of Sam Law."
19-6302. PURPOSE. The purpose of this chapter is to ensure that vic-
tims of crime may recover restitution or damages from money or property
that offenders earn because of the publicity of their crimes. This chapter
regulates only the money made, not speech itself, in order to protect con-
stitutional free expression. This chapter shall apply to proceeds derived
from criminal notoriety without regard to the expressive content or medium
through which such proceeds are generated and shall not be construed to regu-
late speech or expression.
19-6303. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Crime" means any felony or misdemeanor committed in this state
that results in a conviction.
(2) "Exploit" or "exploitation" means knowingly and commercially de-
riving financial gain where the criminal notoriety of a crime is a substan-
tial contributing factor to the value of the proceeds. Incidental, educa-
tional, journalistic, or expressive references to a crime that are not un-
dertaken for the purpose of deriving commercial gain from criminal notoriety
shall not constitute exploitation under the provisions of this chapter.
(3) "Notoriety of a crime" means the public attention from a crime when
directly connected to the offender's part in the crime.
(4) "Offender" means a person convicted of a criminal offense in this
state.


(5) "Proceeds" means any money, royalties, or other thing of value re-
ceived by an offender that is derived from the criminal notoriety of a crime,
regardless of the medium or form in which the proceeds are generated.
(6) "Victim" is as defined in section 19-5304, Idaho Code.
19-6304. ESCROW ACCOUNT. Any person or company who pays an offender
for work that exploits the notoriety of a crime shall send such payment to
the Idaho state treasurer, who shall place the payment in an interest-bear-
ing escrow account for five (5) years unless extended by court order upon a
showing of good cause. The state treasurer, in consultation with the attor-
ney general and subject to legislative approval, shall adopt rules for such
escrow administration.
19-6305. NOTICE TO VICTIMS. The attorney general shall notify all
known victims within thirty (30) days after money is deposited in escrow.
Victims may file lawsuits or use restitution orders to claim funds during the
escrow period.
19-6306. DISTRIBUTION. (1) If a victim wins a judgment, the court
shall order payment to the victim from the escrow account.
(2) If more than one (1) victim has a valid claim, funds shall be divided
fairly unless the court orders otherwise.
(3) Any money remaining after five (5) years and after all valid claims
are paid shall be returned to the offender.
19-6307. EXCEPTIONS. The provisions of this chapter shall not apply
to:
(1) Payments for legal services;
(2) Works of art or fiction that only briefly mention the crime;
(3) Regular wages or income not related to the crime;
(4) Money earned before the crime was committed; or
(5) News or documentary works created mainly to inform or educate and
where the offender is paid only normal interview fees.
19-6308. FREEDOM OF SPEECH. (1) Nothing in this chapter shall be in-
terpreted as restricting or censoring freedom of speech. The provisions of
this chapter shall apply only to money made from the publicity of a crime, not
to the content of expression itself.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall be construed narrowly to com-
ply with the first amendment to the constitution of the United States and
section 9, article I of the constitution of the state of Idaho.
19-6309. PENALTIES. Any person or company that knowingly fails to sub-
mit proceeds as required by this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty
of up to three (3) times the amount withheld, plus attorney's fees. The at-
torney general may bring a civil action to recover such penalties.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.